Utah statutes.
35A-6-103.    Apprenticeship agreements -- Terms and conditions.

Every apprenticeship agreement entered into under this chapter shall contain:

(1)  the names of the contracting parties;

(2)  the date of birth of the apprentice;

(3)  a statement of the trade, craft, or business which the apprentice is to be taught, and the time at which the apprenticeship will begin;

(4)  a statement showing the number of hours to be spent by the apprentice in work and the number of hours to be spent in related and supplemental instruction, which instruction shall be not less than 144 hours per year, unless prior educational experience is substituted or prior practical experience programs are substantial as provided in other state laws;

(5)  a statement setting forth a schedule of the work processes in the trade or industry divisions in which the apprentice is to be taught and the approximate time to be spent at each process;

(6)  a statement of the graduated scale of wages to be paid the apprentice and whether the required school time shall be compensated;

(7)  a statement providing for a period of probation during which time the apprenticeship agreement may be terminated by either party to the agreement; and

(8)  a statement that if an employer is unable to fulfill the employer's obligation under the apprenticeship agreement, the employer may transfer such obligation to another employer.

